Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201290-535
Department of Health and Human Services;
Public Assistance.

AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

Program No. 347 - Public Assistance

FY2011-12
FY2012-13

GENERAL
FUND
266,818,578
108,524,785

CASH
FUND
6,044,444
3,310,000

FEDERAL
FUND est.
141,003,570
103,663,429

PROGRAM
TOTAL
413,866,592
215,498,214

There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2011-12 $266,818,578 General Funds,
$6,044,444 Cash Funds, and $141,003,570 Federal Funds estimate for state aid,
which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation
to this program for FY2012-13 $108,524,785 General Funds, $3,310,000 Cash Funds,
and $103,663,429 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.

There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2011-12 $810,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for
state aid to aid in carrying out the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program
and to provide payment to caregivers to purchase services under the respite
subsidy program. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2012-13 $810,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for
state aid to aid in carrying out the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program
and to provide payment to caregivers to purchase services under the respite
subsidy program.

There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2011-12 $2,734,444 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for
state aid for the continuation of the behavioral health provider rate increase.

If Legislative Bill 985A,
One Hundred Second Legislature, Second Session, 2012, becomes law, the reduction
to the FY2012-13 General Fund appropriation to Program 347 contained in Legislative
Bill 985A, One Hundred Second Legislature, Second Session, 2012, shall not
be made in Program 347 but shall be reduced from Program 354.

If Legislative Bill 993A,
One Hundred Second Legislature, Second Session, 2012, becomes law, the FY2012-13
and FY2013-14 General Fund appropriations to Program 347 contained in Legislative
Bill 993A, One Hundred Second Legislature, Second Session, 2012, shall be
transferred to Program 354 and are hereby appropriated.

If Legislative Bill 820A,
One Hundred Second Legislature, Second Session, 2012, becomes law, the FY2012-13
and FY2013-14 General Fund appropriations to Program 347 contained in Legislative
Bill 820A, One Hundred Second Legislature, Second Session, 2012, shall be
transferred to Program 354 and are hereby appropriated.

If the home visitation
program earmark contained in section 47, Legislative Bill 968, One Hundred
Second Legislature, Second Session, 2012, becomes law, the earmark shall transfer
to Program 354.

There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2011-12 $500,000 General
Funds for home visitation programs. There is included in the appropriation
to this program for FY2012-13 $750,000 General Funds for an increase for home
visitation programs receiving funds in FY2011-12.

Laws 2012, LB949A, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB968, § 47;

Laws 2012, LB985A, § 5.